California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(b) A registered company may secure structural pest control work, submit bids, or otherwise contract for pest control work. A registered company may employ licensed field representatives and licensed operators to identify infestations or infections, make inspections, and represent the company in the securing of pest control work. A registered company may hire or employ individuals who are not licensed under this chapter to perform work on
 contracts covering Branch 1, 2, or 3, or any combination of branches, only after an operator or field representative has fully completed the negotiation or signing of the contract covering a given job.

(c) This section shall not be construed to authorize an unlicensed individual to perform work that requires a license pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 359, Sec. 1.   (AB 2529)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

8506.2.

A “qualifying manager” is the licensed operator or operators designated by a registered company to supervise the daily business of the company and to be physically present at the principal office or branch office location for a minimum of nine days every three consecutive calendar months to supervise and assist the company’s employees. These days shall be documented and provided to the board upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 181, Sec. 1.   (AB 1874)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

8507.

(a) “Structural pest control field representative” is any individual who is licensed by the board to secure structural pest control work, identify infestations or infections, make inspections, apply pesticides, submit bids for or otherwise contract, on behalf of a registered company.

A pest control field representative shall not contract for pest control work or perform pest control work on his or her own behalf.

(b) As used in this chapter, “field representative” refers to “structural pest control field representative.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 354, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8507.1.

(a) (1) “Structural pest control applicator” is any individual who is licensed by the board to apply pesticides in Branch 2 or Branch 3 on behalf of a registered company.

(2) A structural pest control applicator shall not contract for pest control work or perform pest control work in his or her own behalf.

(b) As used in this chapter, “applicator” refers to “structural pest control applicator.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 11.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8508.

“Household” means any structure and its contents that are used for persons and their convenience.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 430, Sec. 33.   (AB 181)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

8509.

“Branch office” is any fixed place of business in addition to the location of the principal office for which the company registration is issued, where records are kept, mail received, statements rendered, money is collected, or requests are received for service or bids, or information is given pertaining to the practice of pest control, other than governmental offices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 354, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8510.

For purposes of this chapter, “wood preservative” means any coating formulated to protect wood surfaces from deterioration caused by insects, fungus, rot, and decay and which contains a wood preservative chemical that is registered with the Department of Pesticide Regulation and the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 354, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8511.

“Manufacturer” is a person engaged in the processing of materials used in the practice of pest control, but who does not himself engage in such practice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1163.)
-------------------------------------------

8512.

“Employer” refers to a registered company that employs operators, field representatives, applicators, and other individuals, the latter not being required to be licensed under this chapter, who work on pest control jobs under the supervision of an operator or field representative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 354, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8513.

(a) The board shall prescribe a form entitled “Notice to Owner” that shall describe, in nontechnical language and in a clear and coherent manner using words with common and everyday meaning, the pertinent provisions of this state’s mechanics lien laws and the rights and responsibilities of an owner of property and a registered pest control company thereunder. Each company registered under this chapter, prior to entering into a contract with an owner for work for which a company registration is required, shall give a copy of this “Notice to Owner” to the owner, his or her agent, or the payer.

(b) No company that is required to be registered under this chapter shall require or request a waiver of lien rights from any subcontractor, employee, or supplier.

(c) Each company registered under this chapter that acts as a subcontractor for another company registered under this chapter shall, within 20 days of commencement of any work for which a company registration is required, give the preliminary notice in accordance with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) of Title 2 of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code, to the owner, his or her agent, or the payer.

(d) Each company registered under this chapter that acts as a prime contractor for work for which a company registration is required shall, prior to accepting payment for the work, furnish to the owner, his or her agent, or the payer a full and unconditional release from any claim of mechanics lien by any subcontractor entitled to enforce a mechanics lien pursuant to Section 8410 of the Civil Code.

(e) Each company
 registered under this chapter that subcontracts to another company registered under this chapter work for which a company registration is required shall furnish to the subcontractor the name of the owner, his or her agent, or the payer.

(f) A violation of the provisions of this section is a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 430, Sec. 34.   (AB 181)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

8514.

(a) A Branch 2 or 3 registered company shall not commence work on a contract, or sign, issue, or deliver any documents expressing an opinion or statement relating to the control of household pests, or wood destroying pests or organisms until the registered company has completed an inspection.

(b) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, after an inspection has been made, a registered company which holds a branch registration for the control of household pests, or wood destroying pests or organisms, but whose branch registration restricts the method of eradication or control permitted, may recommend and enter into a contract for the eradication or control of pests within the
 scope of its branch registration, provided that it subcontracts, in writing, the actual performance of the work to a registered company which holds a branch registration authorizing the particular method to be used.

(c) A registered company may subcontract, in writing, any pest control work for which it is registered in any branch or branches to a registered company holding a valid branch registration to do that work.

(d) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit a registered company or the consumer from subcontracting with a licensed contractor to do any work authorized under Section 8556.

(e) A registered company shall not subcontract structural fumigation work, as permitted in this section, without the written consent of the consumer. The consumer shall be informed in advance, in writing, of any
 proposed work which the registered company intends to subcontract and of the consumer’s right to select another person or entity of the consumer’s choosing to perform the work. The consumer may authorize the subcontracting of the work as proposed or may contract directly with another registered company licensed to perform the work. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to eliminate any otherwise applicable licensure requirements, nor permit a licensed contractor to perform any work beyond that authorized by Section 8556.

(f) Nothing contained in this section shall permit or authorize a registered company to perform, attempt to perform, advertise or hold out to the public or to any person that it is authorized, qualified, or registered to perform, pest control work in a branch, or by a method, for which it is not registered, except that a Branch 2 or Branch 3 registered company may advertise fumigation or any all encompassing treatment
 described in paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 1991 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations if the company complies with the requirements of this section.

(g) Subcontracting of work, as permitted in this section, shall not relieve the prime contractor or the subcontractor from responsibility for, or from disciplinary action because of, an act or omission on its part, which would otherwise be a ground for disciplinary action. However, the registered company making the initial proposal including proposed work that the registered company intends to subcontract shall not be subject to disciplinary action or otherwise responsible for an act or omission in the performance of the work that the consumer directly contracts with another registered company, person, or entity to perform, as permitted by this section. All home solicitation contracts shall comply with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1688) of Title 5 of Part 2 of
 Division 3 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 12.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8514.5.

It is unlawful for any registered company under this chapter when billing for any subcontracted work authorized under Section 8514, to charge, bill, or otherwise solicit payment from the consumer for any structural fumigation work not actually rendered by the registered company or under its direct supervision unless the consumer, prior to authorizing the performance of the work, is provided in writing with the following statement:

“NOTICE: The charge for service that this company subcontracts to another registered company may include the company’s charges for arranging and administering such services that are in addition to the direct costs associated with paying the subcontractor. You may accept (company name’s) bid or you may contract directly with another registered company licensed to perform the work.

If you choose to contract directly with another registered company, (company name) will not in any way be responsible for any act or omission in the performance of work that you directly contract with another to perform.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 398, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8515.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a company registered hereunder from authorizing an officer, partner, or employee to submit bids, after an inspection by an individual licensed as an operator or field representative under this act, or to sign contracts after negotiation by an individual licensed as an operator or field representative under this act, on behalf of the registered company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 844, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

8516.

(a) This section, and Section 8519, apply only to wood destroying pests or organisms.

(b) A registered company or licensee shall not commence work on a contract, or sign, issue, or deliver any documents expressing an opinion or statement relating to the absence or presence of wood destroying pests or organisms until an inspection has been made by a licensed Branch 3 field representative or operator employed by a registered company, except as provided in Section 8519.5. The address of each property inspected or upon which work is completed shall be reported on a form prescribed by the board and shall be filed with the board no later than 10 business days after the commencement of an
 inspection or upon completed work.

Every property inspected pursuant to this subdivision or Section 8518 shall be assessed a filing fee pursuant to Section 8674.

Failure of a registered company to report and file with the board the address of any property inspected or work completed pursuant to Section 8518 or this section is grounds for disciplinary action and shall subject the registered company to a fine of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). The address of an inspection report prepared for use by an attorney for litigation purposes shall not be required to be reported to the board and shall not be assessed a filing fee.

A written inspection report conforming to this section and a form approved by the board shall be prepared and delivered to the person requesting
 the inspection and the property owner, or to the property owner’s designated agent, within 10 business days from the start of the inspection, except that an inspection report prepared for use by an attorney for litigation purposes is not required to be reported to the board or the property owner. An inspection report may be a complete, limited, supplemental, or reinspection report, as defined by Section 1993 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations. The report shall be delivered before work is commenced on any property. The registered company shall retain for three years all inspection reports, field notes, and activity forms.

Reports shall be made available for inspection and reproduction to the executive officer of the board or their duly authorized representative during business hours. All inspection reports or copies thereof shall be submitted to the
 board upon demand within two business days. The following shall be set forth in the report:

(1) The start date of the inspection and the name of the licensed field representative or operator making the inspection.

(2) The name and address of the person or firm ordering the report.

(3) The name and address of the property owner and any person who is a party in interest.

(4) The address or location of the property.

(5) A general description of the building or premises inspected.

(6) A foundation diagram or sketch of the structure or structures or
 portions of the structure or structures inspected, including the approximate location of any infested or infected areas evident, and the parts of the structure where conditions that would ordinarily subject those parts to attack by wood destroying pests or organisms exist. Reporting of the infested or infected wood members, or parts of the structure identified, shall be listed in the inspection report to clearly identify them, as is typical in standard construction components, including, but not limited to, siding, studs, rafters, floor joists, fascia, subfloor, sheathing, and trim boards.

(7) Information regarding the substructure, foundation walls and footings, porches, patios and steps, air vents, abutments, attic spaces, roof framing that includes the eaves, rafters, fascias, exposed timbers, exposed sheathing, ceiling joists, and attic walls, or
 other parts subject to attack by wood destroying pests or organisms. Conditions usually deemed likely to lead to infestation or infection, such as earth-wood contacts, excessive cellulose debris, faulty grade levels, excessive moisture conditions, evidence of roof leaks, and insufficient ventilation are to be reported.

(8) One of the following statements, as appropriate, printed in bold type:

(A) The exterior surface of the roof was not inspected. If you want the water tightness of the roof determined, you should contact a roofing contractor who is licensed by the Contractors State License Board.

(B) The exterior surface of the roof was inspected to determine whether or not wood destroying pests or organisms are
 present.

(9) Indication or description of any areas that are inaccessible or not inspected with recommendation for further inspection if practicable. If, after the report has been made in compliance with this section, authority is given later to open inaccessible areas, a supplemental report on conditions in these areas shall be made.

(10) Recommendations for corrective measures.

(11) Information regarding the pesticide or pesticides to be used for their control or prevention as set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 8538.

(12) The inspection report shall clearly disclose that if requested by the person ordering the original report, a reinspection of the structure
 will be performed if an estimate or bid for making repairs was given with the original inspection report, or thereafter.

An estimate or bid shall be given separately allocating the costs to perform each and every recommendation for corrective measures as specified in subdivision (c) with the original inspection report if the person who ordered the original inspection report so requests, and if the registered company is regularly in the business of performing each corrective measure.

If no estimate or bid was given with the original inspection report, or thereafter, then the registered company shall not be required to perform a reinspection.

A reinspection shall be an inspection of those items previously listed on an original report to determine if the recommendations have been
 completed. Each reinspection shall be reported on an original inspection report form and shall be labeled “Reinspection.” Each reinspection shall also identify the original report by date.

After four months from an original inspection, all inspections shall be original inspections and not reinspections.

Any reinspection shall be performed for not more than the price of the registered company’s original inspection price and shall be completed within 10 business days after a reinspection has been ordered.

(13) The inspection report shall contain the following statement, printed in boldface type:
“NOTICE: Reports on this structure prepared by various registered companies should list
 the same findings (i.e. termite infestations, termite damage, fungus damage, etc.). However, recommendations to correct these findings may vary from company to company. You have a right to seek a second opinion from another company.”
(c) At the time a report is ordered, the registered company or licensee shall inform the person or entity ordering the report, that a separate report is available pursuant to this subdivision. If a separate report is requested at the time the inspection report is ordered, the registered company or licensee shall separately identify on the report each recommendation for corrective measures as follows:

(1) The infestation or infection that is evident.

(2) The
 conditions that are present that are deemed likely to lead to infestation or infection.

If a registered company or licensee fails to inform as required by this subdivision and a dispute arises, or if any other dispute arises as to whether this subdivision has been complied with, a separate report shall be provided within 24 hours of the request but, in no event, later than the next business day, and at no additional cost.

(d) When a corrective condition is identified, either as paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (c), and the property owner or the property owner’s designated agent chooses not to correct those conditions, the registered company or licensee shall not be liable for damages resulting from a failure to correct those conditions or subject to any disciplinary action by the board. Nothing in
 this subdivision, however, shall relieve a registered company or a licensee of any liability resulting from negligence, fraud, dishonest dealing, other violations pursuant to this chapter, or contractual obligations between the registered company or licensee and the responsible parties.

(e) The inspection report form prescribed by the board shall separately identify the infestation or infection that is evident and the conditions that are present that are deemed likely to lead to infestation or infection. If a separate form is requested, the form shall explain the infestation or infection that is evident and the conditions that are present that are deemed likely to lead to infestation or infection and the difference between those conditions. In no event, however, shall conditions deemed likely to lead to infestation or infection be
 characterized as actual “defects” or as actual “active” infestations or infections or in need of correction as a precondition to issuing a certification pursuant to Section 8519.

(f) The report and any contract entered into shall also state specifically when any guarantee for the work is made, and if so, the specific terms of the guarantee and the period of time for which the guarantee shall be in effect. If a guarantee extends beyond three years, the registered company shall maintain all original inspection reports, field notes, activity forms, and notices of completion for the duration of the guarantee period and for one year after the guarantee expires.

(g) For purposes of this section, “control service agreement” means an agreement, including extended warranties, to have a
 licensee conduct over a period of time regular inspections and other activities related to the control or eradication of wood destroying pests and organisms. Under a control service agreement a registered company shall refer to the original report and contract in a manner as to identify them clearly, and the report shall be assumed to be a true report of conditions as originally issued, except it may be modified after a control service inspection. A registered company is not required to issue a report as outlined in paragraphs (1) to (11), inclusive, of subdivision (b) after each control service inspection. If after control service inspection, no modification of the original report is made in writing, then it will be assumed that conditions are as originally reported. A control service contract shall state specifically the particular wood destroying pests or organisms and the portions of
 the buildings or structures covered by the contract.

(h) A registered company or licensee may enter into and maintain a control service agreement provided the following requirements are met:

(1) The control service agreement shall be in writing, signed by both parties, and shall specifically include the following:

(A) The wood destroying pests and organisms covered by the control service agreement.

(B) Any wood destroying pest or organism that is not covered must be specifically listed.

(C) The type and manner of treatment to be used to correct the infestations or infections.

(D) The structures or buildings, or portions thereof, covered by the agreement, including a statement specifying whether the coverage for purposes of periodic inspections is limited or full. Any exclusions from those described in the original report must be specifically listed.

(E) A reference to the original inspection report.

(F) The frequency of the inspections to be provided, the fee to be charged for each renewal, and the duration of the agreement.

(G) Whether the fee includes structural repairs.

(H) If the services provided are guaranteed, and, if so, the terms of the guarantee.

(I) A statement that all corrections of infestations or infections covered by the control service agreement shall be completed within six months of discovery, unless otherwise agreed to in writing by both parties.

(2) The original inspection report, the control service agreement, and completion report shall be maintained for three years after the cancellation of the control service agreement.

(3) Inspections made pursuant to a control service agreement shall be conducted by a Branch 3 licensee. Section 8506.1 does not modify this provision.

(4) A full inspection of the property covered by the control service agreement shall be conducted and a report filed pursuant to
 subdivision (b) at least once every three years from the date that the agreement was entered into, unless the consumer cancels the contract within three years from the date the agreement was entered into.

(5) Under a control service agreement, a written report shall be required for the correction of any infestation or infection unless all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The infestation or infection has been previously reported.

(B) The infestation or infection is covered by the control service agreement.

(C) There is no additional charge for correcting the infestation or infection.

(D) Correction of the infestation or infection takes place within 45 days of its discovery.

(E) Correction of the infestation or infection does not include fumigation.

(6) All notice requirements pursuant to Section 8538 shall apply to all pesticide treatments conducted under control service agreements.

(i) All work recommended by a registered company, where an estimate or bid for making repairs was given with the original inspection report, or thereafter, shall be recorded on this report or a separate work agreement and shall specify a price for each recommendation. This information shall be provided to the person requesting the inspection, and shall be retained by the registered company with
 the inspection report copy for three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 312, Sec. 93.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8517.

Any work contract, billing, agreement, letter of work completed, or other correspondence or document expressing an opinion or making a statement relating to the presence or absence of wood destroying pests or organisms, shall refer to the inspection report required by Section 8516. These documents shall indicate specifically whether all of the recommended work as set forth in the inspection report was completed, or, if not, the document shall indicate specifically which recommendations were not completed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 572, Sec. 4.   (SB 1481)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8518.

(a) When a registered company completes work under a contract, it shall prepare, on a form prescribed by the board, a notice of work completed and not completed, and shall furnish that notice to the owner of the property or the owner’s agent within 10 business days after completing the work. The notice shall include a statement of the cost of the completed work and estimated cost of work not completed.

(b) The address of each property inspected or upon which work was completed shall be reported on a form prescribed by the board and shall be filed with the board no later than 10 business days after completed work.

(c) A filing fee shall be assessed pursuant to
 Section 8674 for every property upon which work is completed.

(d) Failure of a registered company to report and file with the board the address of any property upon which work was completed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8516 or this section is grounds for disciplinary action and shall subject the registered company to a fine of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(e) The registered company shall retain for three years all original notices of work completed, work not completed, and activity forms.

(f) Notices of work completed and not completed shall be made available for inspection and reproduction to the executive officer of the board or his or her duly authorized representative during business hours. Original notices of work completed or not completed or copies thereof shall be
 submitted to the board upon request within two business days.

(g) This section shall only apply to work relating to wood destroying pests or organisms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 799, Sec. 41.   (SB 1039)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

8519.

Certification as used in this section means a written statement by the registered company attesting to the statement contained therein relating to the absence or presence of wood-destroying pests or organisms and, listing such recommendations, if any, which appear on an inspection report prepared pursuant to Section 8516, and which relate to (1) infestation or infection of wood-destroying pests or organisms found, or (2) repair of structurally weakened members caused by such infestation or infection, and which recommendations have not been completed at the time of certification.

Any registered company which makes an inspection report pursuant to Section 8516, shall, if requested by the person ordering the inspection report, prepare and deliver to that person or his or
 her designated agent, a certification, to provide:

(a) When the inspection report prepared pursuant to Section 8516 has disclosed no infestation or infection: “This is to certify that the above property was inspected on ____ (date(s)) in accordance with the Structural Pest Control Act and rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, and that no evidence of active infestation or infection was found in the visible and accessible areas.”

(b) When the inspection report prepared pursuant to Section 8516 discloses infestation or infection and the notice of work completed prepared pursuant to Section 8518, or when the reinspection report prepared pursuant to Section 8516, indicates that all recommendations to remove that infestation or infection and to repair damage caused by that infestation or infection have been completed: “This is to certify that the property described herein is
 now free of evidence of active infestation or infection in the visible and accessible areas.”

(c) When the inspection report prepared pursuant to Section 8516 discloses infestation or infection and the notice of work completed prepared pursuant to Section 8518 indicates that the registered company has not completed all recommendations to remove that infestation or infection or to repair damage caused by it: “This is to certify that the property described herein is now free of evidence of active infestation or infection in the visible and accessible areas except as follows: ____ (describing infestations, infections, damage or evidence thereof, excepted).”

(d) When a limited inspection report prepared pursuant to Section 8516 has disclosed no infestation or infection: “This is to certify that a limited inspection report was conducted on the area of the property described herein on
 ____ (date(s)) in accordance with the Structural Pest Control Act and rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, and has revealed no evidence of active infestation or infection in the visible and accessible areas inspected.”

This certification shall be included on and made part of the complete, limited, supplemental, or reinspection report prepared pursuant to Section 8516, and by a copy of the notice of work completed prepared pursuant to Section 8518, if any notice has been prepared at the time of the certification, or the certification may be endorsed on and made a part of that inspection report or notice of work completed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 572, Sec. 5.   (SB 1481)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8519.5.

(a) After an inspection report has been prepared by a Branch 3 registered company pursuant to Section 8516, which discloses a wood destroying pest or organism that can be eradicated by fumigation, and the fumigation has been duly performed by a Branch 1 registered company, the Branch 1 registered company, on a company document that identifies the licensee performing the fumigation and the name and address of the registered company, shall issue the following certification: “This is to certify that the property located at ____ (address) was fumigated on ____ (date) for the extermination of ____ (target pest).” This certification shall be issued to the registered company that prepared the inspection report within five working days after completing the fumigation.

(1) Where a consumer has authorized a Branch 3 registered company to subcontract the fumigation to a Branch 1 registered company, a copy of the certification pursuant to subdivision (a) shall accompany any inspection report, notice of work completed pursuant to Section 8518, or certification issued by the Branch 3 registered company.

(2) Where the consumer has elected to contract directly with a Branch 1 registered company to perform a fumigation, the Branch 1 registered company shall provide the certification described in subdivision (a) to the consumer who ordered the fumigation.

(b) A warranty for fumigation shall be provided in writing by the registered company contracting with the owner or the owner’s designated agent. 

(c) In the event of a failed
 fumigation, the following shall apply:

(1) When a consumer authorizes a Branch 3 registered company to subcontract the fumigation to a Branch 1 registered company, the Branch 3 registered company shall verify the need for a refumigation and issue an inspection report in accordance with Section 8516. The consumer shall not be charged for this inspection. Following completion of the refumigation, a new certification and any additional warranty or guarantee shall be issued to the owner or the owner’s designated agent.

(2) When the consumer elects to contract directly with a Branch 1 registered company to perform a fumigation, the Branch 1 registered company shall do all of the following:

(A) Verify the need for a refumigation by obtaining a Branch 3 inspection at no charge to the consumer during the duration of a
 warranty or guarantee issued by the Branch 1 registered company.

(B) Maintain with the original inspection report, on a company document, all of the following:

(i) The name of the current owner of the structure fumigated, the address of the structure, and the date of the failed fumigation.

(ii) An explanation of the need for refumigation.

(iii) The proposed date for the refumigation. Following completion of the refumigation, a new certification and any additional warranty or guarantee shall be issued to the owner or the owner’s designated agent.

(C) Within five working days after the completion of the refumigation, the Branch 1 registered company, on a company document, shall file with the
 current owner, notification of the Branch 3 registered company whose report was used for the original fumigation, or refumigation. Any certification issued by the Branch 1 registered company shall also comply with subdivision (a), if applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 572, Sec. 6.   (SB 1481)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [8520. - 8536.]

8520.

(a) There is in the Department of Consumer Affairs a Structural Pest Control Board, which consists of seven members.

(b) Subject to the jurisdiction conferred upon the director by Division 1 (commencing with Section 100), the board is vested with the power to and shall administer the provisions of this chapter.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that consumer protection is the primary mission of the board.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2028, deletes or extends that date. Notwithstanding any other
 law, the repeal of this section renders the board subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 507, Sec. 1.   (SB 813)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8520.1.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the Structural Pest Control Board in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 107, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

8520.2.

(a) The Structural Pest Control Board is hereby transferred from the jurisdiction of the Department of Pesticide Regulation and placed under the jurisdiction of the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(b) The registrar of the board under the jurisdiction of the Department of Pesticide Regulation shall remain as the registrar of the board under
 the jurisdiction of the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(c) The members appointed to the board while under the jurisdiction of the Department of Pesticide Regulation shall remain as members of the board under the jurisdiction of the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(d) All employees of the board under the jurisdiction of the Department of Pesticide Regulation are hereby transferred to the board under the jurisdiction of the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(e) The duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdictions of the board under the jurisdiction of the Department of Pesticide Regulation shall remain with the board under the jurisdiction of the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(f) For the performance of the duties and the exercise of the
 powers vested in the board under this chapter, the board shall have possession and control of all records, papers, offices, equipment, supplies, or other property, real or personal, held for the benefit or use by the board formerly within the jurisdiction of the Department of Pesticide Regulation.

(g) Any reference to the board in this chapter or in any other provision of law or regulation shall be construed as a reference to the board under the jurisdiction of the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 11.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

8521.

The board is composed of seven members, three of whom shall be, and shall have been for a period of not less than five years preceding the date of their appointment, operators licensed under this chapter actively engaged in the business of pest control and who are residents of this state, and four public members who shall not be licentiates of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 189, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8522.

(a) Members of the board shall be appointed for a term of four years, subject to removal by the appointing power at his or her pleasure.

(b) Vacancies shall be filled by the appointing power for the unexpired term.

(c) Each member shall hold office until the appointment of his or
 her successor not to exceed one year from the expiration of the term for which he or she was appointed. No person shall serve as a member of the board for more than two consecutive terms.

(d) Each appointment shall be for a four-year term expiring four years after either the date of the appointment or the date a previous term expired.
